Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2611
Continuing competency requirements; waiver.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, may waive continuing competency requirements, in part or in total, for any two-year licensing period when a credential holder submits documentation that circumstances beyond his or her control prevented completion of such requirements as provided in section 38-146. In addition to circumstances determined by the department to be beyond the credential holder's control pursuant to such section, such circumstances shall include situations in which:

(1) The credential holder has submitted proof that he or she was suffering from a serious or disabling illness or physical disability which prevented completion of the required continuing competency activities during the twenty-four months preceding the renewal date; or

(2) The credential holder was initially licensed within the twenty-six months immediately preceding the renewal date.

Laws 1965, c. 415, § 2, p. 1325;

Laws 1985, LB 250, § 14;

Laws 1986, LB 926, § 46;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 42;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 123;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 99;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 10;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,136.01;

Laws 2007, LB236, § 27;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 883;

Laws 2008, LB972, § 2.